Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Agricultural Limestone

250.650.
Definitions for KRS 250.650 to 250.720.

As used in KRS

250.650

to

250.720

unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means the Department of Agriculture;

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture;

“Owner” means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, organization or association or any combination thereof who owns a business for the purpose of manufacturing, processing, quarrying, mining or dredging of agricultural limestone which may be exposed or offered for sale in the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

“Agricultural limestone” means limestone that is used for the purpose of neutralizing the acidity of soil and thereby improving its fertility.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 160, § 1, effective June 16, 1960.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A product sold as “liquid lime” and advertised as reducing the acidity in soil comes within the definition in subsection (4) of this section.

OAG 76-39

.

250.660.
Limestone business owner required to register — Fees — Process agent for nonresident.

On or before July 1, 1960, and on or before July 1 of each year thereafter, any owner who conducts a business for the purpose of offering or exposing for sale agricultural limestone shall register with the department, on a form supplied by the department, before such owner shall engage in any business in Kentucky. Every owner shall register annually thereafter with the department and shall pay an annual fee of ten dollars ($10.00) for each place of business maintained in Kentucky during the year. The registration and annual fee shall also be paid by any owner maintaining a place of business outside Kentucky but engaging in business within Kentucky. Every nonresident owner shall designate a resident agent upon whom service of notice or process may be made to enforce the provisions of KRS

250.650

to

250.720

or any liabilities arising from violations of KRS

250.650

to

250.720

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 160, § 2, effective June 16, 1960.

250.670.
Power to promulgate regulations and standards.

The Commissioner shall have the power to promulgate, alter, or rescind any rules or regulations for the enforcement of KRS

250.650

to

250.720

and the following matters:

Standards or specifications regarding the calcium carbonate content of agricultural limestone as determined by chemical analysis, and in conformity to acceptable United States Department of Agriculture standards;

Size of particles of limestone as measured by wire mesh screen determination, and in conformity to acceptable United States Department of Agriculture standards;

Furnishing of reports and information necessary for the department to carry out the provisions of KRS

250.650

to

250.720

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 160, § 3, effective June 16, 1960.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Administrative regulations, KRS ch. 13A.

250.680.
Personnel.

The Commissioner may employ such personnel as he may deem necessary for the proper enforcement of KRS

250.650

to

250.720

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 160, § 4, effective June 16, 1960.

250.690.
Inspection powers.

The department’s authorized representative shall have the authority to enter upon public and private premises or to stop public and private conveyances except common carriers for the purpose of inspection and to obtain samples of agricultural limestone.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 160, § 5, effective June 16, 1960.

250.700.
Grounds for revocation of registration.

A registration may be revoked at any time for just cause as hereinafter provided. Grounds for revocation of a registration are as follows:

Material misrepresentations made for the purpose of defrauding any member of the public or the sale of any materials which do not conform to the standards prescribed by the Commissioner or as set forth in KRS

250.650

to

250.720

by an owner or any regular employee, solicitor, agent, or representative of the owner.

Failure by the owner to pay any final judgment rendered against any owner or regular employee, solicitor, agent, or representative of the owner by reason of violations of any provisions of KRS

250.650

to

250.720

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 160, § 6; 1968, ch. 152, § 131.

250.710.
Notice and hearing after refusal to grant or revocation of registration — Appeal.

The Commissioner shall notify any applicant or owner by certified mail, return receipt requested of any decision to refuse to grant a registration or to revoke a registration within ten (10) days after the decision, and the applicant or owner shall have thirty (30) days after the notification within which to petition the Commissioner for a hearing to be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. If the applicant or owner is aggrieved by the final order, the applicant or owner may appeal the final order to the Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. If the owner takes an appeal within the time herein provided, the revocation by the Commissioner shall not become final until finally adjudicated; however, the Commissioner may require the posting of a reasonable and appropriate bond pending final adjudication.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 160, § 7; 1968, ch. 152, § 132; 1974, ch. 315, § 34; 1980, ch. 114, § 54, effective July 15, 1980; 1996, ch. 318, § 171, effective July 15, 1996.

250.720.
Disposition of fees and fines.

All moneys received from the registration fees and fines collected by the department hereunder shall be deposited to a revolving fund in the State Treasury to be used for the administration and enforcement of KRS

250.650

to

250.720

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 160, § 8; 1968, ch. 152, § 133.